Illinois, session 104th, SB1372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Public 5Higher Education Act. 6    Section 5. Intent. It is the intent of the General 7Assembly that the requirements set forth in this Act should 8apply equally to each public institution of higher education 9in this State and to the governing board of each public 10institution of higher education in this State, except as 11otherwise provided in this Act. 12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:13    "Governing board of each public institution of higher 14education" means the Board of Trustees of the University of 15Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 16University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 17the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 18Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 19Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 20of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 21Northern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Western 22Illinois University, and the board of trustees of each   SB1372- 2 -LRB104 03571 LNS 13595 b1community college district in this State.2    "Public institution of higher education" means the 3University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 4State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 5University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 6University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 7University, a public community college in this State, or any 8other public university, college, or community college now or 9hereafter established or authorized by the General Assembly. 10    Section 15. Right of students to free speech. The 11governing board of each public institution of higher 12education, other than the board of trustees of a community 13college district, is prohibited from punishing students for 14exercising their right to free speech, including, without 15limitation, by withholding transcripts or refunds or altering 16a student's housing status, admission status, or current or 17continuing status as an enrolled student at the public 18institution of higher education. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.